src/morphology/roots/punctuation.lexc
! -*- mode: lexc; coding: utf-8 -*-
! Punctuation characters detailed here are the characters that appear commonly
! in Finnish texts, but are not part of words or linguistic content. The
! punctuations control clause and sentence level annotations, and range
! from full stops and commas to brackets. While punctuation symbols might
! have limited use as inflecting units, the ones described here refer to
! punctuation symbols as used in their primary purpose, in isolation. The
! part of language norms controlling punctuation are from orthography and
! the references of punctuation in good language use are not from the grammar
! but issues of Kielikello journal on good Finnish language use. The most
! current issue on punctuation was [KK2/2006]_.

LEXICON PUNCTUATION
    Brackets                    ;
    ClauseBoundingPunctuation  ;
    MiscSymbols                 ;
    QuotationMarks              ;
    SentenceBoundingPunctuation ;
    ClauseBoundingPunctuation   ;

! The primary punctuation marks are sentence final punctuation, they mark
! the end of a sentence. The most typical of these is full stop symbol, which
! ends neutral sentences. The exclamation mark and question mark end
! exclamative and questioning sentences respectively. An elliptic or unfinished
! sentence is ended with three successive full stops. In sloppy writing style it
! is common to use two, four or more full stops to mark an elliptic sentence.
! The Unicode compatibility character ellipsis has never been used for Finnish
! language and must not be used. Same applies for other combinations of
! sentence ending punctuation marks, the most common of these have separate
! analyses.
LEXICON SentenceBoundingPunctuation
.'][SUBCAT=PUNCTUATION][BOUNDARY=SENTENCE]:.      Ennd        ;
%!'][SUBCAT=PUNCTUATION][BOUNDARY=SENTENCE]:%!      Ennd        ;
?'][SUBCAT=PUNCTUATION][BOUNDARY=SENTENCE]:?        Ennd        ;
...'][SUBCAT=PUNCTUATION][BOUNDARY=SENTENCE]:...    Ennd    ;
..'][STYLE=NONSTANDARD][SUBCAT=PUNCTUATION][BOUNDARY=SENTENCE]:..  Ennd    ;
....'][STYLE=NONSTANDARD][SUBCAT=PUNCTUATION][BOUNDARY=SENTENCE]:.... Ennd ;
%!?'][STYLE=NONSTANDARD][SUBCAT=PUNCTUATION][BOUNDARY=SENTENCE]:%!?    Ennd    ;
?&!'][STYLE=NONSTANDARD][SUBCAT=PUNCTUATION][BOUNDARY=SENTENCE]:?%!    Ennd    ;
%#'][POS=PUNCTUATION]:%#    Ennd    ;

! The clause level punctuation marks are used in clause boundaries. The most
! typical of these is comma. The colon and semicolon are too. The clause
! boundaries do not have separate semantics needed in applications so they only
! have analyses for clause boundaries.
LEXICON ClauseBoundingPunctuation
,'][SUBCAT=PUNCTUATION][BOUNDARY=CLAUSE]:,	Ennd	;
%:'][SUBCAT=PUNCTUATION][BOUNDARY=CLAUSE]:%:	Ennd	;
%;'][SUBCAT=PUNCTUATION][BOUNDARY=CLAUSE]:%;	Ennd	;


! The brackets are used to offset portions of text in opening and closing
! pairs. The most common pair is round brackets. Others used in Finnish are
! square, curly and angle brackets, in somewhat decreasing order of commonness.
! The angle brackets are commonly replaced by lower than symbol for opening and
! greater than symbol for closing bracket.
!
! The bracketed question mark is used to indicate uncertainty and bracketed
! exclamation mark to indicate surprise, both of these annotations are used
! within sentence as other bracketed constructions.
LEXICON Brackets
%<'][SUBCAT=PUNCTUATION][SUBCAT=BRACKET][SUBCAT=INITIAL]:%<	Ennd	;
%>'][SUBCAT=PUNCTUATION][SUBCAT=BRACKET][SUBCAT=FINAL]:%>	Ennd	;
('][SUBCAT=PUNCTUATION][SUBCAT=BRACKET][SUBCAT=INITIAL]:(	Ennd	;
)'][SUBCAT=PUNCTUATION][SUBCAT=BRACKET][SUBCAT=FINAL]:)	Ennd	;
['][SUBCAT=PUNCTUATION][SUBCAT=BRACKET][SUBCAT=INITIAL]:[	Ennd	;
]'][SUBCAT=PUNCTUATION][SUBCAT=BRACKET][SUBCAT=FINAL]:]	Ennd	;
{'][SUBCAT=PUNCTUATION][SUBCAT=BRACKET][SUBCAT=INITIAL]:{	Ennd	;
}'][SUBCAT=PUNCTUATION][SUBCAT=BRACKET][SUBCAT=FINAL]:}	Ennd	;
‹'][SUBCAT=PUNCTUATION][SUBCAT=BRACKET][SUBCAT=INITIAL]:‹ Ennd    ;
›'][SUBCAT=PUNCTUATION][SUBCAT=BRACKET][SUBCAT=FINAL]:› Ennd    ;
(?)'][SUBCAT=PUNCTUATION]:(?)  Ennd    ;
(%!)'][SUBCAT=PUNCTUATION]:(%!)    Ennd    ;

! The quotation marks are used to offset quotations. The typical ones in
! Finnish are the 9-shaped double quotation marks and apostrophes. Angle
! quotation marks can also be used, primarily in books and newspapers.
! It is possible to replace curly quotation marks with neutral typewriter
! ones where technology limits. It is also common to see foreign quotation
! marks or accent marks in place of quotation marks in sloppy writing style.
LEXICON QuotationMarks
”'][SUBCAT=PUNCTUATION][SUBCAT=QUOTATION][SUBCAT=FINAL]:”	Ennd	;
”'][SUBCAT=PUNCTUATION][SUBCAT=QUOTATION][SUBCAT=INITIAL]:”	Ennd	;
»'][SUBCAT=PUNCTUATION][SUBCAT=QUOTATION][SUBCAT=FINAL]:»	Ennd	;
»'][SUBCAT=PUNCTUATION][SUBCAT=QUOTATION][SUBCAT=INITIAL]:»	Ennd	;
’'][SUBCAT=PUNCTUATION][SUBCAT=QUOTATION][SUBCAT=FINAL]:’	Ennd	;
’'][SUBCAT=PUNCTUATION][SUBCAT=QUOTATION][SUBCAT=INITIAL]:’	Ennd	;
%"'][SUBCAT=PUNCTUATION][SUBCAT=QUOTATION][SUBCAT=INITIAL][FILTER=NO_PROC]:%"	Ennd	;
%"'][SUBCAT=PUNCTUATION][SUBCAT=QUOTATION][SUBCAT=FINAL][FILTER=NO_PROC]:%"	Ennd	;
''][SUBCAT=PUNCTUATION][SUBCAT=QUOTATION][SUBCAT=FINAL]:'	Ennd	;
''][SUBCAT=PUNCTUATION][SUBCAT=QUOTATION][SUBCAT=INITIAL]:'	Ennd	;

! There are two different dashes in Finnish. The hyphen is used for mainly
! word internally and won't appear as itself. The dash is used to offset
! some sentences or mark elision. The dash symbol can be either of unicode
! dash symbols or replaced with dash offset by spaces. In sloppy writing,
! two hyphens are often used in place of dashes.
LEXICON Dashes
-'][SUBCAT=PUNCTUATION][SUBCAT=DASH][FILTER=NO_PROC]:-	Ennd	;
–'][SUBCAT=PUNCTUATION][SUBCAT=DASH]:–  Ennd    ;
--'][SUBCAT=PUNCTUATION][SUBCAT=DASH]:--	Ennd	;

! The space is used to separate words. For most applications the space has
! separate meaning so it rarely gets used as a symbol in applications of
! omorfi. 
LEXICON Spaces
!% [SUBCAT=PUNCTUATION][SUBCAT=SPACE][FILTER=NO_PROC]:%   Ennd    ; ! ASCII space
 [SUBCAT=PUNCTUATION][SUBCAT=SPACE][FILTER=NO_PROC]:     Ennd    ; ! NBSP

! Less used symbols that appear in the Finnish texts; these do not have 
! special analyses. A slash can be used as a replacement of the meaning 'or',
! as a division slash or as a separator of verses in poem. 
! Backslash is used only in computer systems.
! Underscore is used only in computer systems.
! The pipe is used in dictionaries as morhpeme boundary, and computer systems.
! At sign is used only in computer systems.
! An ampersand can be used as a replacement of the meaning 'and'.
! Percent symbol is used after numeric expressions meaning 0.01 multiplier.
! Permille symbol is used after numeric expressions meaning 0.001 multiplier.
! § sign is used for numbering sections etc.
! Degree sign is used with measurements. The second and minute signs can be
! used in conjunction with degree sign.
! The plus sign, specific minus sign and plus-minus signs are used in
! numeric expressions. The multiplication sign is used in numeric expressions.
! The equals sign is used in formulae. The asterisk is used as a marker
! for ungrammatical constructions and computer and other expressions.
! Registered and trademark symbols are rarely used. Copyright symbol is
! rarely used. Hash sign is used in phones and computer systems.
! The doubled § sign has been used as chapter range sign. The pilcrow
! sign can be used to mark chapters.
! The currency signs for euro, dollar, pound sterling, cent and yen can be
! used. I don't think anyone uses the currency sign ever.
LEXICON MiscSymbols
/'][SUBCAT=SYMBOL]:/	Ennd	;
\'][SUBCAT=SYMBOL]:\  Ennd    ;
_'][SUBCAT=SYMBOL]:_  Ennd    ;
|'][SUBCAT=SYMBOL]:|  Ennd    ;
@'][SUBCAT=SYMBOL]:@  Ennd    ;
&'][SUBCAT=SYMBOL]:&	Ennd	;
%%'][SUBCAT=SYMBOL]:%%    Ennd    ;
‰'][SUBCAT=SYMBOL]:‰      Ennd    ;
§'][SUBCAT=SYMBOL]:§	Ennd	;
°'][SUBCAT=SYMBOL]:°  Ennd    ;
′'][SUBCAT=SYMBOL]:′  Ennd    ;
″'][SUBCAT=SYMBOL]:″  Ennd    ;
+'][SUBCAT=SYMBOL][SUBCAT=MATH][SUBCAT=OPERATOR]:+	Ennd	;
−'][SUBCAT=SYMBOL][SUBCAT=MATH][SUBCAT=OPERATOR]:−  Ennd    ;
±'][SUBCAT=SYMBOL][SUBCAT=MATH][SUBCAT=OPERATOR]:±  Ennd    ;
×'][SUBCAT=SYMBOL][SUBCAT=MATH][SUBCAT=OPERATOR]:×  Ennd    ;
·'][SUBCAT=SYMBOL][SUBCAT=MATH][SUBCAT=OPERATOR]:·  Ennd    ;
*'][SUBCAT=SYMBOL]:*  Ennd    ;
®'][SUBCAT=SYMBOL]:®  Ennd    ;
™'][SUBCAT=SYMBOL]:™  Ennd    ;
©'][SUBCAT=SYMBOL]:©  Ennd    ;
%#'][SUBCAT=SYMBOL]:%#    Ennd    ;
!! The lines below this one are not from any referenced source
§§'][SUBCAT=SYMBOL]:§§	Ennd	;
¶'][SUBCAT=SYMBOL]:¶  Ennd    ;
€'][SUBCAT=SYMBOL][SUBCAT=CURRENCY]:€  Ennd    ;
$'][SUBCAT=SYMBOL][SUBCAT=CURRENCY]:$  Ennd    ;
¥'][SUBCAT=SYMBOL][SUBCAT=CURRENCY]:¥  Ennd    ;
¢'][SUBCAT=SYMBOL][SUBCAT=CURRENCY]:¢  Ennd    ;
¤'][SUBCAT=SYMBOL][SUBCAT=CURRENCY]:¤ Ennd    ;
